Utah statutes.
63M-9-402.   Plans for collaborative service delivery systems.
(1)  The council shall provide incentives for communities to develop
collaborative service delivery systems.  If a community desires to enter into
a contract with the council under this section, it shall submit to the council
a plan for a collaborative service delivery system.  That plan shall be in a
form prescribed by the council and shall include at least the following:
(a)  the community’s designation of a state agency, school district,
political subdivision, or private entity that will act as fiscal agent for the
plan;
(b)  an assurance that the plan was developed through an inclusive process
involving, when available, parents of children and youth at risk,
representatives of state agencies and local governments, educators, school
districts, child and family advocacy groups, religious and service
organizations, and parent-teacher associations;
(c)  a description of how the collaborative service delivery system will be
administered, including the membership, powers, and duties of any board,
commission, or council that will direct the service delivery system;
(d)  a budget for the proposed collaborative service delivery system,
including funds requested from the council;
(e)  a description of a performance monitoring system to be used by the
community, including the community’s performance goals and performance
indicators; and
(f)  any waivers to the rules of the State Board of Education, Department of
Human Services, Department of Health, or rule of judicial administration
necessary to carry out the community initiative.
(2)  In awarding an application under this section, the council shall consider
the extent to which the proposed community initiative:
(a)  promotes early intervention and prevention;
(b)  employs a collaborative method of delivering services;
(c)  is endorsed by all public and private service delivery agencies that are
anticipated to provide services to at-risk children and youth under the
proposed collaborative service delivery system;
(d)  is accountable for results;
(e)  utilizes private community resources, including resources provided by
religious and service organizations;
(f)  utilizes the resources of the at risk child’s immediate and extended
family;
(g)  leverages county, municipal and school district funding sources to
enhance the scope, extent, and availability of services;
(h)  leverages private funding sources within the community to enhance the
scope, extent, and availability of services;
(i)  employs individualized and coordinated service plans;
(j)  establishes a single point of entry for children, youth, and their
families who require services;
(k)  provides comprehensive services for children and youth at risk through
grade 12 and appropriate prenatal care; and
(l)  exhibits innovation in delivering services or addressing needs.
(3) (a)  On or before July 1, 1996, the council shall adopt a prospectus to
solicit proposals for the submission of plans.
(b)  From among the proposals for plans received under Subsection (3)(a), the
council may award grants to communities to partially or fully pay for the
development of plans.
(c)  From the plans received under Subsection (3)(b), the council may contract
with the fiscal agent designated in the plan.  That contract shall contain at
least the following provisions:
(i)  a description of the scope of work and program narrative;
(ii)  a description of the community’s performance monitoring system which
shall coordinate with existing performance monitoring systems, including the
community’s performance goals and performance indicators;
(iii)  an enumeration of the dollar amount that will be provided by the
council to the fiscal agent; and
(iv)  a waiver to an administrative rule, if any, granted by the agency that
adopted the rule.
(d)  For fiscal year 1996-97, a contract under Subsection (3)(c) is for the
period of time between April 1, 1997, and June 30, 1997.  For each fiscal year
thereafter, a contract may not exceed the period of the fiscal year.
